Utah statutes.
78B-5-619.   Access to medical records of deceased patient.

For purposes of Section 78B-5-618, and 45 C.F.R., Parts 160 and 164, Standards for Privacy of Individually Identifiable Health Information, a health care provider with medical records of a deceased person may recognize the deceased person's surviving spouse or an adult child as a personal representative.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

